Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.160

Effective date of irrevocable inter vivos trust—Effective date of revocable inter vivos or testamentary trust.

For the purposes of RCW 11.98.130 through 11.98.150 the effective date of an instrument purporting to create an irrevocable inter vivos trust is the date on which it is executed by the trustor, and the effective date of an instrument purporting to create either a revocable inter vivos trust or a testamentary trust is the date of the trustor's or testator's death.

[ 1989 c 14 s 2; 1985 c 30 s 58. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 90; 1965 c 145 s 11.98.040; prior: 1959 c 146 s 4. Formerly RCW 11.98.040.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.